New York, session 2025-2026, S1741.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the agriculture and markets law, as amended 2 by chapter 458 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 355. Abandonment of animals. A person being the owner or possessor, 4 or having charge or custody of an animal, who abandons such animal, or 5 leaves it to die in a street, road or public place, or who allows such 6 animal, if it become disabled, to lie in a public street, road or public 7 place more than three hours after [he] such person receives notice that 8 it is left disabled, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprison- 9 ment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than five 10 hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by both. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05301-01-5